Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-2913
Act; bonding or insurance requirements.

Nothing in the Political Subdivisions Construction Alternatives Act shall limit or reduce statutory or regulatory requirements regarding bonding or insurance.

Laws 2002, LB 391, § 13; R.S.1943, (2003), § 79-2013;

Laws 2008, LB889, § 13.